GRAMMARS/FRENCH/APPLICATIONS/ACCENTUATION/FST2/src/lex-prenoms.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:		lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:      proper names : first names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:     FRENCH
!#
!# AUTHOR:       A. Rebotier, A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	8-Mar-2006 (AS, AR)
!# UPADTED:	19-Jul-2007 (AS : converted to lexc)
!#
!# ============================================================================

LEXICON PRENOMM	< %+Prop:0 %+Firstname:0 %+SgPl:0 %+Masc:0 >	#;
LEXICON PRENOMF	< %+Prop:0 %+Firstname:0 %+SgPl:0 %+Fem:0 >	#;
LEXICON PRENOM	< %+Prop:0 %+Firstname:0 %+SgPl:0 %+MF:0 >	#;

LEXICON ROOT
Abdeljaouad	PRENOMM;
Abélienne	PRENOMF;
Abram	PRENOM;
Acarie	PRENOMF;
Adalasie	PRENOMF;
Adalberto	PRENOMM;
Addée	PRENOMF;
Adelberta	PRENOMF;
Adélicia	PRENOMF;
Adéliska	PRENOMF;
Adélorina	PRENOMF;
Adelvina	PRENOMF;
Adgive	PRENOMF;
Adjutorine	PRENOMF;
Adolinia	PRENOMF;
Adonia	PRENOMF;
Adorildée	PRENOMF;
Advélinia	PRENOMF;
Afanassi	PRENOM;
Aglaïa	PRENOMF;
Aigline	PRENOMF;
Aimé	PRENOMM;
Akako	PRENOM;
Akizumi	PRENOM;
Albaïse	PRENOMF;
Albertina	PRENOMF;
Alcilie	PRENOMF;
Aldénise	PRENOMF;
Aldoïsia	PRENOMF;
Alédina	PRENOMF;
Alejandro	PRENOMM;
Alexilianne	PRENOMF;
Alfhild	PRENOM;
Algérine	PRENOMF;
Alisette	PRENOMF;
Almandina	PRENOMF;
Alméra	PRENOMF;
Almondina	PRENOMF;
Almos	PRENOMM;
Alouisia	PRENOMF;
Alparslan	PRENOM;
Alphélisa	PRENOMF;
Alphoncine	PRENOMF;
Altrude	PRENOMF;
Alvilda	PRENOMF;
Alzérinia	PRENOMF;
Amadélice	PRENOMF;
Amaransia	PRENOMF;
Ambrosie	PRENOMF;
Ambrozy	PRENOM;
Amelle	PRENOMF;
Amilcare	PRENOMM;
Amildée	PRENOMF;
Anaïsse	PRENOMF;
Anathodie	PRENOMF;
Andréanna	PRENOMF;
Andrew	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Andronico	PRENOM;
Anélie	PRENOMF;
Angelina	PRENOMF;
Aniko	PRENOMF;
Annelle	PRENOMF;
Anorée	PRENOMF;
Anouck	PRENOM;
Antéline	PRENOMF;
Antonello	PRENOMM;
Antoninia	PRENOMF;
Apolina	PRENOMF;
Araceli	PRENOM;
Arberie	PRENOMF;
Arcilléa	PRENOMF;
Arganie	PRENOMF;
Ariel	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Aristine	PRENOMF;
Armédia	PRENOMF;
Armia	PRENOMF;
Arnélise	PRENOMF;
Árni	PRENOMM;
Arrigo	PRENOM;
Arsilienne	PRENOMF;
Arthélia	PRENOMF;
Arvilise	PRENOMF;
Ascérie	PRENOMF;
Astérianne	PRENOMF;
Astrid	PRENOM;
Athanaïse	PRENOMF;
Attilio	PRENOMM;
Auberta	PRENOMF;
Audiana	PRENOMF;
Auglorina	PRENOMF;
Auphilinia	PRENOMF;
Aurèle	PRENOM;
Aurélia	PRENOMF;
Aurilia	PRENOMF;
Austie	PRENOMF;
Auxilianne	PRENOMF;
Avélie	PRENOMF;
Axilda	PRENOMF;
Aygül	PRENOM;
Azarielle	PRENOMF;
Azelmina	PRENOMF;
Azucena	PRENOMF;
Azzouz	PRENOM;
Bachir	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Bamu	PRENOM;
Bastian	PRENOMM;
Batoul	PRENOM;
Belinda	PRENOM;
Berk	PRENOMM;
Berl	PRENOM;
Bessora	PRENOMF;
Bihter	PRENOM;
Blahoslav	PRENOMM;
Boleslav	PRENOM;
Boutros	PRENOMM;
Briac	PRENOM;
Brynhildur	PRENOMF;
Burçin	PRENOM;
Camillus	PRENOM;
Casimir	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Catherin	PRENOM;
Cennet	PRENOM;
Chanah	PRENOM;
Cheikha	PRENOMF;
Chomei	PRENOM;
Cihangir	PRENOMM;
Clet	PRENOM;
Clive	PRENOMM;
Corazon	PRENOMF;
Cumhur	PRENOMM;
Cyriane	PRENOM;
Damien	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Darin	PRENOM;
Della	PRENOM;
Dennis	PRENOMM;
Dervishe	PRENOMF;
Dinçer	PRENOMM;
Diomidis	PRENOM;
Domenico	PRENOMM;
Donatella	PRENOM;
Dounia	PRENOMF;
Dwayne	PRENOM;
Edoardo	PRENOMM;
Eichi	PRENOM;
Elefterios	PRENOMM;
Elijah	PRENOM;
Elira	PRENOMF;
Ema	PRENOM;
Emin	PRENOMM;
Emma	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Erik	PRENOMM;
Eskel	PRENOM;
Étienne	PRENOMM;
Eulalie	PRENOMF;
Evpraksia	PRENOM;
Evstrat	PRENOMM;
Fahri	PRENOMM;
Farah	PRENOM;
Fatmire	PRENOMF;
Fedir	PRENOMM;
Ferah	PRENOM;
Fikret	PRENOMM;
Fıtnat	PRENOMF;
Flavien	PRENOMM;
Foka	PRENOM;
Francis	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Fuat	PRENOMM;
Fulgencio	PRENOM;
Fulin	PRENOMF;
Gabi	PRENOM;
Geirfinnur	PRENOMM;
Genn	PRENOM;
Gervais	PRENOMM;
Gianluigi	PRENOMM;
Giertruda	PRENOMF;
Giovanni	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Gittel	PRENOM;
Gonzalve	PRENOMM;
Gregorio	PRENOM;
Greta	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Gülsün	PRENOM;
Gunnar	PRENOMM;
Günseli	PRENOMF;
Hacina	PRENOM;
Hafiz	PRENOMM;
Halldór	PRENOMM;
Hanifa	PRENOM;
Harold	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Hatsu	PRENOM;
Haxhere	PRENOMF;
Heiner	PRENOM;
Helward	PRENOMM;
Hikmet	PRENOM;
Hisano	PRENOM;
Holger	PRENOMM;
Humberto	PRENOM;
Ibrahim	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Idel	PRENOM;
Ihcène	PRENOM;
Ilir	PRENOMM;
Ilkka	PRENOM;
Inga	PRENOMF;
Ingvild	PRENOM;
Isabeau	PRENOM;
Issaak	PRENOMM;
Itamar	PRENOM;
Jaber	PRENOM;
Jamshid	PRENOMM;
Jannick	PRENOM;
Jean-Adrian	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Ambroise	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Arnaud	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Bill	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Charles	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Dan	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Édouard	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Eugène	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-François-Xavier	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Gerald	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Guy	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Horace	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Jacob	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-John	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Kemal	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Lino	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Mario	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Mick	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jeannette	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Jean-Odilon	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Philippe	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Raoul	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Roméo	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Sébastien	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Ted	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Ulrich	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jean-Yannick	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Jeppe	PRENOM;
Jimmy	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Joey	PRENOM;
Jökull	PRENOMM;
Josip	PRENOMM;
Josyane	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Joy	PRENOM;
Kadri	PRENOM;
Kamran	PRENOM;
Karl	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Kassy	PRENOMF;
Katsu	PRENOM;
Kelsey	PRENOM;
Khamel	PRENOM;
Kinhide	PRENOM;
Kiraz	PRENOM;
Kirk	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Kiyotoki	PRENOM;
Klaara	PRENOMF;
Konstantia	PRENOM;
Kreshnik	PRENOMM;
Kudret	PRENOM;
Ladislav	PRENOMM;
Laila	PRENOM;
Laurine	PRENOM;
Lawrence	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Léda	PRENOMF;
Léonilde	PRENOM;
Leo	PRENOMM;
Lindsay	PRENOM;
Lipaz	PRENOMF;
Loleh	PRENOM;
Lothar	PRENOMM;
Lowell	PRENOM;
Ludvík	PRENOMM;
Lula	PRENOM;
Lydie	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Mabrouk	PRENOM;
Mafalda	PRENOM;
Maja	PRENOM;
Manolya	PRENOM;
Marcello	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Margeta	PRENOM;
Maricke	PRENOMF;
Marie-Bela	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marie-Delphine	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marie-Georgette	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marie-Joan	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marie-Louisette	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marie-Maud	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marie-Pierrette	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marie-Stéphanie	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Marissa	PRENOM;
Martyna	PRENOMF;
Marvin	PRENOM;
Masamura	PRENOM;
Masazane	PRENOM;
Mathieu	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Mauro	PRENOMM;
Mecnun	PRENOM;
Melis	PRENOM;
Messaoud	PRENOM;
Michaïl	PRENOMM;
Micheline	PRENOMF;
Mikhaïla	PRENOM;
Milos	PRENOMM;
Mio	PRENOM;
Moïsseï	PRENOM;
Moussa	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Muammer	PRENOM;
Murashige	PRENOM;
Nadège	PRENOM;
Nadezda	PRENOMF;
Najib	PRENOM;
Napoléon	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Nassima	PRENOM;
Nedjma	PRENOM;
Nezaket	PRENOM;
Nicolaï	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Nikki	PRENOM;
Noé	PRENOM;
Nursel	PRENOM;
Océane	PRENOMF;
Octavio	PRENOMM;
Olivier	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Oluff	PRENOM;
Oskar	PRENOMM;
Ottilja	PRENOM;
Padma	PRENOM;
Paly	PRENOMM;
Paola	PRENOMF;
Patricie	PRENOM;
Paul	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Petroucha	PRENOM;
Petrunia	PRENOMF;
Pierre-Louis	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Porfirio	PRENOM;
Primoz	PRENOMM;
Rachid	PRENOM;
Rafal	PRENOMM;
Ragnhild	PRENOMF;
Ramon	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Raouf	PRENOM;
Réginald	PRENOM;
Rezan	PRENOM;
Rezart	PRENOMM;
Riza	PRENOM;
Rodolfo	PRENOMM;
Rolande	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ronald	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Rosalyn	PRENOM;
Roussana	PRENOMF;
Ruud	PRENOM;
Saban	PRENOMM;
Saint-Albert	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Baptiste	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Christopher	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Sainte-Anaïs	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Sainte-Catherine	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Sainte-Émilie	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Sainte-Honorine	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Sainte-Karine	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Saint-Elvis	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Sainte-Marie-Ange	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Sainte-Ninon	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Sainte-Sabine	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Saint-Fred	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Harry	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Jean-Marie	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Klaus	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Maurice	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Pascal	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Roberto	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Stanislas	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Saint-Walter	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Salim	PRENOM;
Salina	PRENOMF;
Sayed	PRENOM;
Sébastian	PRENOMM;
Şennur	PRENOM;
Seziş	PRENOM;
Shinzaburo	PRENOM;
Sid	PRENOM;
Simen	PRENOM;
Sisse	PRENOMF;
Slavomír	PRENOMM;
Spiridon	PRENOM;
St-Anatole	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Bernardo	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Cyril	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Ste-Anne-Élisabeth	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ste-Chantal	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ste-Emma	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ste-Huguette	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ste-Karen	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ste-Marianne	PRENOMF;	! [1]
St-Émile	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Ste-Nicole	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ste-Rosa	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Ste-Yael	PRENOMF;	! [1]
St-Franck	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Günter	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Ion	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Jürgen	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Marcel	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Noël	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Ramon	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Sean	PRENOMM;	! [1]
St-Ugo	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Svetya	PRENOM;
Svyatoslav	PRENOMM;
Taïssia	PRENOMF;
Tanju	PRENOM;
Terrie	PRENOM;
Théo	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Tokie	PRENOM;
Trefil	PRENOM;
Türkan	PRENOM;
Týr	PRENOMM;
Ursula	PRENOMF;	! [1]
Utkarsha	PRENOM;
Vedat	PRENOMM;
Verda	PRENOM;
Viola	PRENOMF;
Volodymyr	PRENOM;
Waclaw	PRENOMM;
Willard	PRENOM;
Xhevahire	PRENOMF;
Yasser	PRENOMM;	! [1]
Yédah	PRENOM;
Yukimasa	PRENOM;
Zébulon	PRENOM;
Zosima	PRENOMF;
